Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Article 4 Presumed Parentage

15-8.1-401.
Presumption of parentage.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, an individual is presumed to be a parent of a child if:

The individual and the individual who gave birth to the child are married to each other and the child is born during the marriage;

The individual and the individual who gave birth to the child were married to each other and the child is born not later than three hundred (300) days after the marriage is terminated by death, annulment, declaration of invalidity, divorce, or dissolution;

The individual and the individual who gave birth to the child married each other after the birth of the child and the individual at any time asserted parentage of the child and the individual agreed to be and is named as a parent of the child on the birth certificate of the child; or

The individual resided in the same household with the child, and the individual and another parent of the child openly held out the child as that person’s own from the time the child was born or adopted and for a period of two (2) years thereafter, including periods of temporary absence, and assumed personal, financial or custodial responsibilities for the child.

A presumption of parentage shall be rebuttable and may be overcome, and competing claims to parentage resolved only by court order under this chapter or a valid denial of parentage pursuant to article 3 of this chapter.

A presumed parent shall be established as a legal parent by the execution of a valid voluntary acknowledgement of parentage under article 3, by an adjudication of parentage under this chapter or as otherwise provided in this article.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-402.
Challenge to presumed parent.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a proceeding to challenge the parentage of an individual whose parentage is presumed under §

15-8.1-401

, shall be commenced within two (2) years after the birth of the child.

A proceeding to challenge the parentage of an individual whose parentage is presumed under §

15-8.1-401

, may be commenced two (2) years or more after the birth of the child in the following circumstances:

A presumed parent who is not the genetic parent of a child and who could not reasonably have known about the birth of the child may commence a proceeding under this section within two (2) years after learning of the child’s birth.

An alleged genetic parent who did not know of the potential genetic parentage of a child and who could not reasonably have known on account of material misrepresentation or concealment may commence a proceeding under this section within two (2) years after discovering the potential genetic parentage.

If the person is adjudicated to be the genetic parent of the child, the court may not disestablish a presumed parent.

Regarding a presumption under §

15-8.1-401

(a)(4), another parent of the child may challenge a presumption of parentage if that parent openly held out the child as the presumptive parent’s child due to duress, coercion, or threat of harm. Evidence of duress, coercion, or threat of harm may include whether within the prior ten (10) years, the person presumed to be a parent pursuant to §

15-8.1-401(a)(4)

, has been convicted of domestic assault, sexual assault, or sexual exploitation of the child or another parent of the child, was subject to a final abuse protection order pursuant to chapter 15 of title 15, because the person was found to have committed abuse against the child or another parent of the child, or was substantiated for abuse against the child or another parent of the child pursuant to §

11-9-5.3

.

Challenges under this section shall be adjudicated pursuant to §

15-8.1-206

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 395, § 2, effective July 14, 2021.

15-8.1-403.
Multiple presumptions or conflicting claims.

If two (2) or more conflicting presumptions arise under this chapter, the court shall adjudicate parentage pursuant to §

15-8.1-206

.

If in a proceeding to adjudicate a presumed parent’s parentage of a child, another individual, in addition to the individual who gave birth to the child, asserts a claim to parentage of the child, the court shall adjudicate parentage pursuant to §

15-8.1-206

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.